District of Columbia statutes.
8-1774.06

Sustainable energy branding.

(a)

Within 90 days after October 22, 2008, the DDOE shall determine a brand name for the provision of energy efficiency and renewable energy services in the District of Columbia.

(b)

Within 90 days after October 22, 2008, the DDOE shall establish and maintain a website for the brand, with a web address of the brand name bracketed by www. and .org, .com, or .gov. The purpose of this website shall be to serve as a portal that will provide information about every energy efficiency and renewable energy program available to District residents and businesses, including those offered by:

(1)

The DDOE;

(2)

The SEU;

(3)

The electricity or natural gas companies;

(4)

The federal government;

(5)

Nonprofit entities; and

(6)

Any contractors or subcontractors for any of the entities set forth in paragraphs (1) through (5) of this subsection.

(c)

The DDOE shall provide a phone number that shall serve as a hotline for the brand during normal business hours.

(d)

The DDOE shall be responsible for working with providers of energy efficiency and renewable energy services to ensure that all information is accurate and up-to-date.

Oct. 22, 2008, D.C. Law 17-250, § 206, 55 DCR 9225
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 206 of Clean and Affordable Energy Emergency Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-508, September 25, 2008, 55 DCR 10856).
This section is referenced in § 8-1774.05, § 8-1774.09, and § 8-1778.44.